Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-165 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
High-dosage tutoring is defined as an evidence-based, intensive
academic intervention delivered to students enrolled in a public
school district participating in an Oklahoma high-dosage tutoring
program. High-dosage tutoring shall include the following
components, consistent with National Student Support Accelerator
research on effective tutoring models:
1. Three thirty (30) to forty-five (45) minute sessions per
week, embedded during or immediately after the school day;
2. Delivered by a consistent, trained tutor;

Req. No. 14589 Page 1

3. Provided in a one-to-one or small group format, with no more
than four students per tutor unless otherwise approved by the State
Department of Education;
4. Implemented for no fewer than ten (10) week sessions; and
5. Regular assessment data usage to understand student
strengths and needs.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14589 SW 01/10/26















Req. No. 14589 Page 2